tools/hyphenators/smj_hyph.tex
.abl1
.all1
.ang1
.ar1k
.avi1
.áss1
.bád1
.bá1j
.ca2
.cer1
.cg1
.cm1
.čj2
.dáb1
.ds2
.dtv1
.eak1
.eka1
.enr1
.ep1
.esc1
.eva1
.fur1
.gád1
.gg1i
.gnr1
.gs2
.hab1
.he1k
.hus1
.ien1
.iht1
.ii2
.inf1
.jes1
.jiq1
.jv1
.kár1
.kra1
.kva1
.kør1
.lx1
.mak1
.ma2l
.nár1
.nd2
.neg1
.nik1
.nk2
.nt2
.någ1
.oxi1
.pc1o
.pfi1
.pp2
.pps1
.pta1
.qu1
.rd2
.rn2
.ro2
.rom1
.rs2s
.ss2
.st2
.sv2
.tre1
.ug1
.ull1
.vd2
.vk1
.vol1
.vt1
.våg1
.yj2
.zys1
.æä1g
.æä1k
.æä1l
.äin1
.ån2n
.år1
.åvd1
a1aá
a1ac
1a2ad
1aah
a1a2i
a1al
a1ao
1aap
a1asa
a1a1u
a1aw
a1ax
a1á
abat1
1abc
abin1
a1bn
ab1oa
ab1r
2ac
1acc
a1cd
ach1
a2c1n
1acr
ac2æ
a1č
a1ç
2a1d
ada1v
ade1
1adg
1adh
ad1j
adju1
a2dm
ad2n
adsj1
a2dy
ad1ø
a1đ
a1e
a1eb
ae2co
aek1
a1é
a1f
1af.
afid1
2a1g
aga1
age1s
aggu1
1agno
a2gr
aha1
ahel1
a2hk
a1hv
a2hæ
ai2a
a1ib
a1ic
a2id
a1ie
a1if
a1io
a1iq
a1is
a1it
a1í
a2j1
a1ja
a1j2á
a1je
a1ji
ajid1
ajki1
a1jl
a1jo
aj2t
a1jå
a2k
1akb
a2k1e
akek1
1aker1
ak1f
a1kg
ak2h
ak2ko
a1kl
a2k1o2
1akp
aktu1
ak1us
2a1l
2ala
a2lab
ale1l
a2lin
alle1
1alq
1alte
1al'
2a1m
a2mad
am2bh
a2mk
a2m1o
a2mw
anah1
a1ná
a1nb
an2da
ane1
angs1
a1nj
an1ju
1annn
a1no
an2sa
1ant
a1nu
1an`
a2ŋ
a1o
1aof
1aor
a1ó
a1p
ap2c
a2p1d
a2pf
a2p1g
a2po
app2
a2py
a1q
2ar
ar2a
ara1i
arao1
ara1t
a2r1á
a2r1e
ar2ga
ar1ip
a1rn
a1r2o
ar2r
arrá1
ars1s
ar2v1
a2rå
asa1v
a2sá
as1ád
as2j1
as1l
as2m1
assi1
2ast
a1su
asyk1
a1š2k
2at
2ata
atán1
atn1
a2ts
att1á
a2t1u
a2t1ø
a1þ
a2u
au2a
a1ud
aug1
a1ui
a1u1r
a1vg
av1h
1avit
1avl
a2vo
1av'
a1w
a1x
1a2xi
a2xm
a1ya
a1yi
a2yo
a2yr
a1z
a1æ
a1ø
aøk1
a1ö
a1å
a1°
á1a
á1á
ába1
á1bn
á1br
á1c
ácd1
2áč
2á1d
ád1j
ád2t
á1đ
á1e
2áf
á2fg
á2fj
2á1g
á2hk
1áhká
á2i
á2is
á1í
2áj
á2ja
áj1b
áj1e
áj1i
áj2ra
áj1s
1ájv
á1j2æ
ájæä1
á1jå
ák1
á1kr
ákse1
álad1
á1lá
1álg
állo1
álok1
á1m
ámá1
áme1
ám1v
ánag1
á1ná
ánáj1
á1nb
á2nj
1ánn
á1no
áns1
á1nu
á1næ
á1o
á2p1
á2pm
ápol1
1áppá
á2pu
á2py
2á1r
árd1
áre1l
ár1n
ár1oa
árrá1
árre1
ása1
ásim1
á2sj1
ás2k
ásmá1
á1su1
1áš
2á1t
á2t1á1
átja1
át1n
á2t1o
á2ts
át2te
át2ti
á2tv
á2t1å
á1þ
á1u
á2v
á1vb
á1vg
á1vo
á1vp
á1x
á1y
á1z
á1æ
á1ø
á1å
âa2
âd2
âdg1
âeg1
âend1
âid1
âj2
âl2
âr2
âs2
ât2
âx2
1b2a
2bad
bah1
bai1
bali1
bas1s
bata1
1bá
b1áb
b1ád
bári1
b1át
b1áv
2b1b
bb2c
bbe1
bb2l
bbot1
2bc
b2cn
b1č
b1ç
2b1d
bda1
bd2f
1be
b1ek1
2b1em
be1n
2bé1
b1f2
b1g
1b2h
bh1æ
bh1ö
1b2i
bie2
bik1
b1il'
b1ip
b1í
2bj
b1ja
b1jb
b1je
b1jn
bj1s
b1ju
2bk
b1kr
bk1æ
2b1l
b2lá
bl1e
bl1k
2b1m
bma1
bm2b
bme1
bmi1
b2m1o
bmt1
b2mw
2bn2
bnad1
b1nj
b1no
bnr1
b1nu
1b2o
boad1
b1oah
bo2dæ
bok1
bord1
bo2x1
1bô
2b2p
bp2c
bq1
br2
b2r1á
1br2d
b2re
bri2
br1n
1bro1
b2rut
1brå
2bs2
b2sa
b1st2
2b2t
bto1
bt2t
bt1å
1bu
b1ue
bu1r
b2ü
1b1v2
bve1
2b1w
b1x
1b2y1
b1z
1bæ
b1æäd
1bä1
1bø
1b2ö
1bå
b1åd
b1åk
b2åv
2b'
2b`
2b´
1ca
2c1ab
c1ak
c1al
2c1á
1c2b2
2c1c2
cc1at
ccg1
ccm1
c1č
c1ç
1cd
c1dr
2cdæ
cd1å
1ce
ceks1
c1ex
2c1f2
cfot1
cfyl1
1c1g
c2ga
cg1j
cg1o
2c1h
ch1g
ch1l
1ci
cia1a
cid1
c1í
2cj
c1k
ckul1
c2l
clhu1
cl2i
cls2
cm1t
1cn2
2cn.
c1næ
1co
com1
cos1
c1p
c1q
2c2r
2cs
c2s1e
2c1t
cti1
c2tj
c1þ
1cu
c1un
cu2p1i
1cú
1c1v
2cve
c1w
cwi1
2c1x
c1yd
c1yk
c1æ
2c2ø
c1ö
2c1å
2c'
2c`
2c´
1ča
č2á
čás1
2č1č
č1d
1če
čet1
če2x
čn2
1čo
čok2
čp2
čr2
1čs2
č1å
1d2a
2dab
da2bo
da1c
daht1
2dakv
dara1
dars1
da2ru
das1
2d1aw
1d2á
dága1
dá1j1
dá1jr
dáli1
2db
d2be
d2b1o1
db1p
dbu1
db1æ
dbæä1
d2bå
2dc
dc2h
d1cl
2d1č
2d1ç
2d1d
dda1t
d2dá
dde1
dd2j
ddo1
1d2e
de1d
de1l
2dem
dep1
deri1
d1é
2df2
dfd1i
2dg
d2gaj
d1go
dg1sj
2d1h
1di
dia1
d2id1
d2ie
dill1
ding1
dinn1
2diq
d1irg
dis1
dit2
2d1í
2dj
dja1
dje1
djet1
d1ji1
d2j1n
d1jr
d1ju
dju1h
d1jå
1d2k
dk1i
dk2k
dk1o
dkr1
dk2sa
2dl
d2la
d1l1á
dl1r
2dm
d2m1e
dmi1
1dmit
2d1n2
dne1n
dnos1
dnu1h
dnu1s
1d2o
d1oa
doad1
do2k1
dome1
2d1ó
d1ò
2d1p2
2dq
2d2r2
2ds
ds2f
d2sj
dsj1s
dss2
d1så
d1š
2d1t
1d2u
2duj
dukt1
d1un
duri1
d2ü
1dv2
d2ve
d1w
2d1x
dxt2
d1y
dyrk1
1dys1
d1z
1d2æ
2dø
1då
dåga1
d1ås
dåt1
2d2'
2d`
2d2´
đa2
đbu1k
đc2
2đ1đ
đeks1
đ1g
đj2
đl2
đm2
đn2
đs2
đt2
đw2
đyu1
đån1
e1a
e2ak1
e2al
e1á
1ebd
e2b1i
e1bn
1ebru
2ec
e2cn
e1ç
2ed1
1edb
e2d1it
ed1j
ed1m
edna1
e1do
1edt
e2dæ
ee2a
e1eg
e1ei
1eer
e1et
e1f
e1g
eg1d
e2gr
egår1
1eg'
e2hi
e2hk
ehpa1
e1hr
e2h1æ
ei2a
1e2id
e1ie
e1ih
e1ik
e1ip
e1is
eit1
e1it.
e1í
2ej
e1ja
ejda1
e1je
e1jp
e1ju
e1jå
e1kd
ek1e
1e2kg
e1kl
e2kr
ekto1
ektu1
e2k1v
ek1w
e2lad
el1á
el1et
el1f
el1h
e2lia
el1ie
el1ik
e2lir
el1k
e2lo
elos1
1elv.
e2l1å
e1m
1emac
embi1
emie1
em2l
1emr
e2m1å
en1ag
ena1s
e2ne
en1ei
ene1l
enep1
1eneq
e2nj
en2n2
en1ol
en1r
en2ri
ensu1
en1æ
e2ŋ
e1o
e2on
1eo'
e1p1c
e2p1d
ep2l
e2po
e2pu
ep1æ
1epå
1ep´
e1q
e1r
er1án
e2rh
eris1
er1ja
er1k
1ern
e2rø
e2r1ö
e2saa
es1al
e2sá
es1d
ese1l
esj1k
es2ká
es1l2
1esr
1e2š
e1š2k
etja1
1etna
e2t1o
e2ts
et2ts
e2tva
1ety
e2tå
1et`
1eu1
eu2a
e1ui
euk1
euro1
e1ut
2ev
ev1áj
e1vb
e1w
e1wa
e2xf
e2y
1ez
e2æ
e1ä
1eø
e1ö
e1å
é2l
1é2m
é1n
é1o
é1r2
éré1
2é1t
éto1
é1u
1é2v
ê1z
1fa
f2ac
faf1
fakt1
f2an
far1
f2as
fáb1
f1áh
2f2b
fb1á
fbás1
2f1c
2fd
f2da
fdl1
1f2e
f1ei
f1é
2f1f
ff1as
ffek1
ff2f
f2fn
ff1s
f2h
1f2i
f1ie
1f2j
2fjd
2f2k2
fkj2
2f2l2
flir1
1f2m2
2f1n2
f2na
fnr1
1fo
fob1
fon2
f1ó
f1ò
2fp
fpp2
1f2r
fr1as
fr2s
2fs
fs2n
fs2r
fs2t
fs1æ
fs1å
2f1t2
1fu
2f1v
1f1w2
f1ya
fy1s
2fz
2f2æ
f1ø
føf1
1fö
f1öl
för1
fån1
får1
f2ås
2f'
2f`
2f´
1g2a
ga1b
ga1c
gaht1
ga1k
gamp1
ga1n
ga2sj
gass1
gata1
g1áh
2gás
gátt1
2g2b
gb1s
2gd
g2da
ge1b
ge1h
1gejr
ge2n1
g2er
gesj1
ge1t
2g1ey
2g1f
gfkv1
2g1g
gga1
gge1
ggo1
ggu1s
g2ha
1g2i
gid1
gie1n
gies1
gijl2
gi1o
gird1
gisj1
g1í
2gj
g1ja
g1je
g1ji
gjia1
gjum1
2g1k
2g2l2
glaw1
2g1m
g2ma
g2mü
2g1n2
gna1
2g1ŋ
gŋi1
g2o
go1e
1gok
golu1
g1om
1gon
go2p1
2g2p2
g1q
g2r
gram1
g1ro
2gs
g2s1a
gs1d
gsda2
gs2g
gsj2
g1s2k
gs2m
gs2t
g1så
g1š
2g2t
gt2m
1gu
guli1
gull1
gu2m1u
guos1
gú1
2g1v
gwh1
2g1x
gxt2
gy2
g1ya
g1yn
1gyö
2g1z
2gæ
1g2ö
1g2å
2gåa
gåh1
gårs1
2g2'
2g2`
2g2´
1ha
hab1s
2had
h1af
h2aj
ha1k
ham1
h1aq
ha1r
hara1
ha2ri
1há
hán1
hb2
h1bf
2h1c
h2cn
h1č
2h2d
hder1
hd2n
1h2e
he2i
hej1
he1n
heri1
1hf
1hg1
h2gi
h1h
1h2i
2h1ib
hid1
hiel1
h1ih
h1í
2h2j
hka1
hkát1
hkes1
hket1
hkka1
hko1
hkon1
hkop1
h1kp
hkå1
2hl
h1lá
hle2
hlin1
2h1m
hmas1
2h1n2
h1no
h1np
1ho
hoe1
ho2k1
hon2
h1ons
hop1
h1ó
2hp
h1q
h1r2
2hri
hro1
2h2s2
hs1l
2ht
htes1
htta1
1http
htv1
1ht´
h1þ
1hu
h2ud1
2h1un
hu2p1
h2us
hu2se
hus1s
1hü
1hû
hv2
2h1w
h1x
hy1i
hym1
2h2z1
1hæ
1hä
hän1
1h1ø
h1öl
h1öy
h1åd1
h2åk
hång1
2h'
2h`
2h´
2i1a
ia1h
ia1k
ia1s
ia1t
i1á
i1b
1ibn
i2br
1ibs
ibss1
ib1æ
i2c
i1č
i1d
i2dá
ide1
i2di
id1ja
id1l
1idpá
1idr
i2dv
i2då
i2e
1iedi
ieg1
iejv1
ie2le
ie2li
iel1m
1ielv
iel1æ
ierd1
ierk1
iev1
i1ey
i1f
ifi1
i2fj
i2fr
i2få
i1g
iga1
1ign
igor1
igu1
2ih
iha1
ihta1
ihti1
i2i
ii2a
i2is
i2it
i1í
2i2j1
i1ja
ijad1
i1já
i1je
i1ji
i2jn
i1jo1
i1ju
ij1æ
ij2ä1
i1jå
i1k
ika1
i2k1á
i2kg
i2kl
ik1m
i2k1r
ikro1
i2kv
i1l
il2io
il2s
2im
im1ab
im1ep
i2m1ie
im1l
i1mo
im1t
2i1n
ina2
i2n1á
i2n1b
indi1
in1ek
i2nj
ino1
in1os
in1p
i2n1æ
1iŋ
1io
i1oa
i2ol
i1om
io2næ
i1ox
i1ó
i1p
i2pc
ipp1
1ipsa
1iq
1ird
i1ro
iru1
i2rå
i1s
2is.
i2s1ag
isá1f
isá1h
i2sáj
isá1l
isás1
1isb
is2ga
2i2sj
iska1
1is1l
is1m
isme1
issa1
iss1l
iss1r
i2sæ
is1å
1is´
i1t
2ite
i2tj
i2ts
i2tv
it1w
i1u2
iva1
iv1o
1ivs
i2vu
1iw
i1ww
i1xa
i1y
2i2z
ize1
iz2he
i1æ
i1ä
2i1ö
2i2'
2i2`
2i2´
1í1s
1í1z
j2a
jad1g
jak1
1jakk
1jakn
1jalg
jal2l
ja1r
1jarŋ
jas1
ja2so
jat1
1jatj
ja1u
1jay
1j2á
jádd1
j2ák
jári1
j1bf
1jbj2
j1c2
j1č
2j1d
jd2n
j2do
jd2ta
j2e
j1ei
1jek
jekt1
2j1em
j1e1n
je1p
jer1
jeri1
je1sj
1jesk
je1t
j1ex
j1f2
j1g
jge1
j1h
1jh.
j2ha
j1hk
1jh'
j2i
j1ib
1j2id1
1jih
jik1
1jikk
1j1il
1jis
ji2u
j1í
2j1j
j2ka
jkas1
j2ká
j1kd
jki2
j1kl
j1kr
1jk'
1jk´
j1l
jlát1
jlla1
j2lo
1jl`
2j1m2
j2mi
jmmu1
2j1n2
jnas1
j1ná1
j1no
1jnt
j2o
1joa
j1og
joh1
1joki
1joo
j1ow
1jó
j1ò
j2p2
1jpg
j1q
j1r
1jr.
jr1al
2js2
j2sa
jsj2
jss2
j1st
j1su
jsuk1
2j1t2
j2ta
j2ti
j2tvs
j1þ
j2u
1ju.
j1u2a
jud1
1juda
ju2d1á
ju2du
2jul
juli1
jumi1
1juos
j1ur
jurd1
1juš
1jü
jva1s
jv1i
j1vo
j1w
j1x
2jy
jys1
2j1z
j1æäl
1jæäs
1jä
jäng1
2j2ø2
jøf1
jøi1
jøk1
jøn1
j2å
1jåg
1jåh
j1åj
jå2t
1k2a
k2aa
ka2b1æ
k1add1
kale1
ka1n
kap1
2kar
ka2s
ka1t
k1a1u
2kaö
1ká
1ká.
1káe
ká1h
1káj1
ká2já
ká1k
1kát
1káu
2kb
kb2b
kb1c
kbh1
kb1j
kb1r
kb1s
kb1u
2k1c2
2kč
2k1ç
2k1d2
1k2e1
kes1b
ke2t
ke2vá
2k1f
k2fa
kf1ie
k1go
k1gr
2k1h
k2hi
k1hs
1ki
2kid
k1iel
kie1n
2k1ih
k2io
k1í
2k2j
k1ja
k1jn
k1jæ
2k1k
kkan1
kkar1
kkej1
kk1n
kk2s
k2kw
k2l2
klad1
kl1e
2km
km2l
2k1n
1knev
1ko
ko1as
2kob
k2ol
ko2li
komp1
kont1
k2ot
k2o1u
2k1p2
k2q
k2r
1kra
krad1
kra1k
kr2d
1krom
k1rp
2kræ
1krå
2k1s
kse1n
ks2g
ks2n
ks2t
ksy1
k2sæ
2k2š1
2k1t
k2t1oc
1ku
k1ue
kulo1
2kuvl
2k1v
kva1a
kv2d
k2vi
kvik1
kv1j
1k2vm
kvul1
k2vå
1kvål
2kw
kwh1
k1x
2k2y
k1yl
2k1z
1kä
1k1ø
k1øl
1kö
1k2å
kå1d
kål2
kår1
k1ås
2k'
2k`
2k2´
1la
2laa
lami1
lam1j
l2an1
lang1
lap1
2l1ap`
2l1aq
la1r1
la2sj
l2á
láb2
1láf
lála1
lári1
2l1b
lb2d
l2by
2lc
l1cd
l2cn
l1cp
2lč
l1ç
2l1d2
ldda1
l2dv
1l2e
le1d
2leh
l2ei
le2n
l1eŋ
leo1
le2pa
le1s
le1t
l2eu
l1él
1lér
2lf
lfa1s
lf1d
lf1g
l1f2å
2l1g
lggu1
lgsm1
lgut1
2lh2
l2ha
l1ht
1li
l1ied
l1iel
2lih
liks1
2l1il
2l2io
li2p1
2liq
l2is2
liss1
l2iw
2l1í
2l1j
lje1
l2jl
2l2k
lkes1
lkki1
l1kä
2l1l
l2lad
lla1n
lla1s
llát1
lle1s
llos1
llow1
ll1ås
2lm
lm2k
lmma1
lm2s
lmås1
2l1n
lne1
ln2g
lnr1
l2n1æ
1l2o
2loc
l1od
lo1e
lo1f
l1oh
l1ol
lono1
l2ó
2lp
l1p2c
2l1q
lqu1
2l1r
lr1p
2l1s
ls2k
ls1l
ls2m
ls1s2
ls2t
l2s1u
l2s1æ
ls1å
l1š
2l1t
l2tá
lt2h
l2ti
ltra1
ltur1
l1þ
1l2u
2l1ub
2luf
lu2k1
lu2p1
2lus
2lv
lv2k
l1vo
l1w
2l1x
2l2y2
2l1z
2l2æ
l1æän
1lä1
l1ø
l1ød
2l2ö
1l2å
l2åh
l1år
l1åsa
lå2t
2l'
2l`
2l´
2l1°
1m2a
2ma1b
mak1
malc1
mali1
ma2sj
2m1au
1m2á
má1n
már1
má2t1
2m1b2
mbi1
mbo1
1m2c2
mcj2
2m1č
2m1d
1md.
1me
2m1e1k1
me1n
mene1
2mep
m2er
me1t
m2eu
2m1é
2m1f2
2m1g
m2ge
m2gy
mg1æ
mg1å
2m1h
1mi
m2id1
mik1
mi2ne
mi2nu
m1iq
m2i2s
2m1í
2mj
m1ja
m1já
m1jh
m1jk
m1jl
m1k
mk1i
mk1n
2ml
ml1i
ml2m
mlt2
mløs1
2m1m
mmas1
mmá1
mme1
mmi1
2m1n2
m2na
m2nj
m2no
1m2o1
moad1
mo2dæ
mok1
mo2sa
mos1e
m1o2u
2moz
2m1p
mp2ca
mp1r
2m1r2
mrd1
2m1s
ms2k
ms2m
m2so
msso1
ms2t
2mt
m2tj
m2ts
m1þ
1mu
muf1
muk1
muma1
m2us
münd1
2mv
m2va
mv2d
m1vg
m1vr
m1ww
mw1y
2m1x
m2xm
m2xs
mxt2
2my
m1yk
mys1
2m1z
1mæ
1m2ä
2m1ø
møn1
2m2ö
mör1
1m2å
m1åh
m2åm
m1åv
2m'
2m`
2m´
2m1°
1n2a
nacd1
na1i
2naí
n2ak
na1r
nass1
na1t
2na`
1ná.
n1áb
1náč
n1áhk
1nár
nára1
2nás
1nát
2nb2
2n2c2
nchi1
2n2č
n1ç
2n1d
nd1ag1
n2dá
nd1b
n2dk
nd2n
n2då
1n2e
ne1d
2nei
n1el
n2en
nena1
n2es
nest1
ne2t1
n2eu
2né
2n1f
n2fa
n2fu
n2fö
2n1g
nga1t
ng1d
ng1id
n2go
ng1ui
2n1h
n2ho
1n2i
n1ied
2n1ie1n
2n1il
n2io
niti1
2n1í
1nja
1n2já
2njd
1nje
2njg
1njia
1njij
n1jo
1nju
n1jæ
n1jø
n1jö
2njå
2n1k
nkis1
nk2p
nkr1
2n1l2
2n1m2
2n1n
nndá1
nnep1
nnji1
nn1r
nnta1
nn1us
n2o
1nob
2n2oc
n1oe
no1h
1noj
nok1
1noko
1nol
1nom
nomi1
no2mu
1nor
n1osj
no1us
2noy
2no`
n1ò
2np
1npj2
np1k
n1q
2nr
n2r1a
nr1b
nrek1
nrik1
nr1it
nr1j
nr2k
nr1n
n1ro
nr1p2
nr1w
nr1æ
n2r1ø
nr1å
2n1s2
nsa1k
ns2n
ns2r
ns1s2
ns2sa
ns2t2
nsu1r
2n1š
2n1t
nta1a
nta1h
nta1s
nt1æ
2n1þ
n2u
1nuj.
2nul
1nun
1nuo
nu2p1
2n1v
n2ve
nvt1
2n1w
nwær1
2n1x
1ny
n1ya
nym1
2n1z2
n2æ
1n2æl
1næv
1nä
nän1
2n1ø
nøn1
nøs1
n2øt
n1ö
n2å
1nå.
n1åk
1nåri
1nåv.
2n'
2n`
2n´
n1°
1ŋa1
1ŋá
ŋd2
1ŋe
ŋe1j
ŋf2
ŋ1g
ŋge1
ŋh2
1ŋi
ŋ1k
ŋ1l2
ŋlok1
2ŋŋ
1ŋo2
ŋot1
1ŋu1
ŋö1
o2a
oab1
oage1
oai1
1oak1
1oal
oan1
oann1
o1as'
o1a2u
o1á
o1b
ob2f
obj1
o2bn
ob1s
o2b1å
1ocku
1ocr
o2cv
o1ç
o1d
od1f
1odj
odná1
1ods
1odt
o2dv
o1ei
oe1n
o1eo
oesc1
o1é
2of
ofi1
o2fj
o1g
oga1
ogo1
o2hg
ohta1
o1ie
o1ij
o1ik
o1is
o1í
2oj
o2ja
oj1av
o2jb
o1ji
o1jk
oj1s
o1k
okal1
okb1
ok1el
ok1ep
o2ki
o2kn
ok2o
o2kr
1oks
ok2v
okva1
1ok´
o1l
ole1
olfa1
1oljo
olle1
ol1m2
olye1
o1m
om1al
oma1s
om1ád
o2md
omen1
o2m1æ
2omø
o2m1å
o1n
onal1
onel1
ong1
on2gu
o2nj
on2n
onr1
o2næ
1on´
o1oa
oog1
o1ot
o2p
opal1
o2pá
op1d
op1g
op1i2
o2pm
op1r
ops1
op1u
o1q
2o1r
orak1
orno1
orta1
1orus
o1s
o2sac
os1ag
os1ak
o2s1á
1ose1
osek1
osin1
osje1
os2k
osko1
os1m
osof1
osop1
os1r
ost1
osto1
osy1
o2s2æ
o2š
o1t
o2tá
oto1
o2tv
ot1ø
o1þ
ou2a
o1ug1
our1
1oust
1out
2o1v
oval1
1ovd
ov2r
ovt1
o1w
o2ws
o1x
o2xf
1oxi
1oy
oy2a
o1yd
o1yi
o1yk
1o1z
o1æ
o1ø
o1å2
oåt1
2o'
1o'h
2o`
2o´
1ó1d
óls1
óns1
óp2
óris1
órs1
2ót
ó1w
ò1d
òi2
ôek1
ôf2
ôgas1
ôk2
ôkb1
ôlaw1
ô1n
ôs2
ô1t2
1p2a
pada1
2p1ag
p1ak
pa1n
1pá.
2p1áj
1pár
1pás
2p1b
pb1es
p2bn
2pc
pc2h
p1cl
2pč
1pd2
1p2e
p1ea
pedi1
pe1n
pes1
2p1f2
p2fa
pfen1
p2fl
1p2fu
2pg2
p1gá
p1ge
pgs2
1pgsa
2p1h
p2ha
ph1f
ph1g
phj2
